Utah statutes.
78B-1-103.   Jurors selected from random cross section -- Opportunity and
obligation to serve.
(1)  It is the policy of this state that:
(a)  persons selected for jury service be selected at random from a fair cross
section of the population of the county:
(b)  all qualified citizens have the opportunity in accordance with this
chapter to be considered for service; and
(c)  all qualified citizens are obligated to serve when summoned, unless
excused.
(2)  A qualified citizen may not be excluded from jury service on account of
race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, occupation, disability, or
economic status.
